South Dakota, session 2026, HB1127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-12-59 be AMENDED:
34-12-59. Except as provided in § 34-12-60, no person may establish or operate
a birth center in this state without an appropriate a license issued under §§ 34-12-57 to
34-12-63, inclusive by the Department of Health in accordance with § 34-12-61.
Section 2. That § 34-12-60 be AMENDED:
34-12-60. The following facilities are exempt from the requirements of §§ 34-12-
57 to 34-12-63 section 5 of this Act, inclusive:
(1) A hospital licensed pursuant to this chapter; and
(2) A critical access hospital licensed pursuant to this chapter.
Section 3. That § 34-12-61 be AMENDED:
34-12-61. An applicant for A person seeking a birth center license shall submit an
application to the Department of Health on a form prescribed by the department. The
application shall must be accompanied by a nonrefundable license fee of five hundred
dollars. The department shall issue a license if, after inspection and investigation, the
department finds that the application and birth center meet the requirements of §§ 34-
12-57 to 34-12-63 section 5 of this Act, inclusive. The birth center license is renewable
annually on a form prescribed by the department.
Section 4. That § 34-12-63 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.208.9 2 1127
34-12-63. A birth center shall adopt, implement, and enforce a written risk
assessment system that conforms to the patient assessment protocols established
pursuant to § 34-12-62. A birth center A practitioner shall perform the risk assessment of
a potential client prior to accepting the client for admission and shall only may admit only
a client that who has been assessed to have a low-risk pregnancy. A birth center client
practitioner shall be continually assessed assess a client to identify if her condition
deviates from a low-risk pregnancy at any time during the pregnancy, delivery, or
postpartum period. At least one practitioner or registered nurse must be on duty in the
birth center at all times if a client is in active labor. The birth center practitioner shall refer
or transfer the client to a physician or hospital in accordance with the standards
established pursuant to § 34-12-62.
Any licensed practical nurse or other nursing personnel involved in client care must
be under the direct supervision of a practitioner or registered nurse licensed in accordance
with chapter 36-9.
For purposes of this section, "practitioner" means a:
(1) Physician licensed in accordance with chapter 36-4;
(2) Certified nurse midwife authorized to practice nurse midwifery as provided in
chapter 36-9A; or
(3) Certified professional midwife licensed in accordance with chapter 36-9C.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-12:
A birth center must have a written plan for each client that:
(1) Addresses the client's medical, physical, mental, and emotional needs;
(2) Is based on a physical examination of the client and an assessment of the client's
medical history upon admission; and
(3) Is approved by the client's attending practitioner, as defined § 34-12-63.
Each client's attending practitioner is responsible for documenting orders and
progress notes on the client's medical record.
Section 6. That § 34-12-58 be REPEALED.
Any birth center shall be located within thirty minutes normal driving time of a
hospital licensed pursuant to this chapter that provides routine birth services.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.